Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 1 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
35-1-106.5. Inspection and consumer services cash fund - creation.

All fees, fines, and penalties collected under articles 12, 13, 14, 21, 33, 36, and 60 of this title 35 and part 2 of article 43 of this title 35, other than civil penalties collected under section 35-21-107.5, shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the inspection and consumer services cash fund, which fund is hereby created in the state treasury. All interest derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the fund. At the end of any fiscal year, all unexpended and unencumbered money in the fund remains in the fund and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or any other fund or used for any purpose other than to offset the costs of implementing, administering, and enforcing the provisions of articles 12, 13, 14, 21, 33, 36, and 60 of this title 35 and part 2 of article 43 of this title 35. Money in the fund is subject to annual appropriation to the department for such purposes.

In accordance with section 24-75-402 (3)(c), C.R.S., the alternative maximum reserve for the inspection and consumer services cash fund is fifty percent of the amount expended from the fund during the fiscal year.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 1902, § 2, effective July 1, 2007.)

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 1724, § 3, effective May 14.

L. 2005:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 1267, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 1902, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(2) amended, (HB 15-1261), ch. 322, p. 1315, § 9, effective June 5.

L. 2017:

(1) amended, (SB 17-225), ch. 262, p. 1247, § 9, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (HB 18-1375), ch. 274, p. 1718, § 73, effective May 29.

L. 2020:

(1) amended, (HB 20-1211), ch. 159, p. 714, § 8, effective June 29; (1) amended, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 754, § 9, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1) by HB 20-1211 and HB 20-1213 were harmonized.

35-1-106.7. Conservation district grant fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the conservation district grant fund. The fund consists of money appropriated to the fund pursuant to section 39-29-109.3 (1)(g)(III). Money in the fund is specifically and continuously appropriated to the department. The department shall grant money in the fund to conservation districts for the purpose of implementing and maintaining soil and water conservation efforts. All money credited to the fund and all interest earned on the investment of money in the fund is part of the fund and shall not be transferred or credited to the general fund or to any other fund.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, by September 1, 2022, and each September 1 thereafter, the department shall distribute two thousand dollars from the conservation district grant fund created in subsection (1) of this section to each conservation district formed pursuant to article 70 of this title 35.

Three days after August 10, 2022, and each July 1 thereafter, the state treasurer shall transfer the sum of one hundred forty-eight thousand dollars from the general fund to the conservation district grant fund created in subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 1649, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 2007:

(1) amended, p. 2047, § 90, effective June 1.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 1872, § 11, effective June 2.

L. 2011:

(2) amended, (HB 11-1156), ch. 134, p. 471, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 2018:

(1.5) added, (HB 18-1338), ch. 201, p. 1309, § 7, effective May 4.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-281), ch. 255, p. 1502, § 13, effective June 18.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-195), ch. 482, p. 3504, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

Subsection (1.5)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (1.5), effective August 1, 2018. (See L. 2018, p. 1309.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-281, see section 1 of chapter 255, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

35-1-106.8. Biological pest control cash fund - transfer of moneys to plant health, pest control, and environmental protection cash fund.

All revenues collected in pursuit of the department's efforts to conduct its program of biological pest control shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the plant health, pest control, and environmental protection cash fund created in section 35-1-106.3. Within sixty days after July 1, 2009, the unexpended and unencumbered balance of the biological pest control cash fund, as that fund existed prior to July 1, 2009, shall be transferred to the plant health, pest control, and environmental protection cash fund.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (HB 09-1249), ch. 87, p. 315, § 2, effective July 1, 2009.)

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 919, § 1, effective May 17.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1249), ch. 87, p. 315, § 2, effective July 1.

35-1-106.9. Agriculture management fund - creation.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the agriculture management fund. The fund shall consist of money transferred pursuant to section 38-13-801.5 (3), any money realized from the sale of the inspection and consumer services division facility and other real property associated with that facility that are all located in the Highlands neighborhood of Denver, Colorado, and any money realized from the sale of the warehouse and storage facility located at 5000 Packing House Road, Denver, Colorado. The department shall use such money to fund agricultural efforts approved by the commissioner, including, but not limited to, funding additional department employees necessary to implement and manage approved programs. Money may be used for direct assistance or grant assistance for conservation districts created pursuant to article 70 of this title 35. Money in the fund may be used for expenses related to the department's office consolidation as authorized by House Bill 13-1234, enacted in 2013, and as authorized by House Bill 16-1460, enacted in 2016. Money in the fund is subject to annual appropriation to the department. Any money not expended or encumbered from any appropriation at the end of any fiscal year shall remain available for expenditure in the next fiscal year without further appropriation. All interest derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the fund and shall not be transferred or credited to the general fund or any other fund.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 865, § 3, effective January 22, 2009.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1234), ch. 170, p. 616, § 3, effective May 10.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (HB 16-1460), ch. 320, p. 1299, § 3, effective June 10.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 468, § 14, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2013 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 170, Session Laws of Colorado 2013. For the legislative declaration in HB 16-1460, see section 1 of chapter 320, Session Laws of Colorado 2016.

35-1-107. Commissioner of agriculture - report - publications - deputy commissioner - rules.

The commissioner of agriculture shall be the chief administrative officer of the department of agriculture and shall have direct control and management of its functions, subject only to the powers and duties of the commission as prescribed in this article. The commissioner shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The commissioner shall be allowed traveling and subsistence expenses actually and necessarily incurred in the performance of official duties. The commissioner shall maintain an office at the state capitol buildings group and shall be custodian of all property and records of the department.

The commissioner shall require of the head of each agency assigned to the department an annual report containing such information and submitted at such time as the commissioner shall decide.

The commissioner shall exercise control over publications of the department and subordinate units thereof and shall cause such publications as are approved for circulation in quantity outside the executive branch to be issued in accordance with the provisions of section 24-1-136, C.R.S.

The commissioner may appoint the deputy commissioner of agriculture, pursuant to section 13 of article XII of the state constitution. Subject to the supervision of the commissioner, the deputy commissioner shall have all the powers, duties, and responsibilities of the commissioner, as provided by law, and shall exercise such powers, duties, and responsibilities in the absence of the commissioner and when so instructed by the commissioner.

The commissioner is authorized to adopt all reasonable rules for the implementation of articles 12, 13, 14, 21, 33, 36, and 60 of this title 35 and part 2 of article 43 of this title 35. Such rules may include, but are not limited to:

The establishment of classifications and subclassifications for any license authorized under said articles; and

The establishment of any penalty fees that may be assessed for violations of said articles or of rules adopted under said articles or under this section.

The commissioner is authorized to accept gifts, grants, and donations of any kind from any private or public source and, upon receipt, shall transmit all such gifts, grants, or donations to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the inspection and consumer services cash fund created in section 35-1-106.5.

The commissioner is authorized to enter into cooperative agreements with any agency or political subdivision of this state or any other state, or with any agency of the United States government, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this article, receiving gifts, grants, or donations, securing uniformity of rules, and entering into reciprocal licensing agreements.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 192, § 7.

CSA:

C. 5, § 13(9).

CRS 53:

§ 6-1-7.

L. 55:

p. 134, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-1-7.

L. 64:

p. 122, § 22.

L. 69:

p. 107, § 2.

L. 71:

p. 105, § 15.

L. 77:

(4) added, p. 1576, § 1, effective May 16.

L. 83:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 841, § 68, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2) amended, p. 1218, § 10, effective August 7.

L. 2003:

(1) and (3) amended and (5), (6), and (7) added, p. 1724, § 4, effective May 14.

L. 2005:

(6) amended, p. 1268, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(6) amended, p. 1903, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(8) added, (SB 09-158), ch. 387, p. 2094, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2018:

IP(5) amended, (HB 18-1375), ch. 274, p. 1718, § 74, effective May 29.

L. 2020:

IP(5) amended, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 755, § 10, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

Subsection (8)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (8), effective February 1, 2010. (See L. 2009, p. 2094.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1996 act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 237, Session Laws of Colorado 1996.

35-1-107.5. Relief program for agricultural events organizations - created - definitions - report - repeal.

Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Agricultural events organization" means a nonprofit or for-profit organization that conducts one or more agricultural events in the state.

"COVID-19" means the coronavirus disease caused by the severe acute respiratory syndrome coronavirus 2, also known as SARS-CoV-2.

"Program" means the agricultural events relief program created in subsection (2) of this section.

Agricultural events relief program. The agricultural events relief program is hereby created within the department. The commissioner shall administer or contract with a third party to administer a relief program to provide relief payments to agricultural events organizations that meet eligibility criteria developed by the commissioner. When determining eligibility for and the size of a relief payment, the commissioner or third-party contractor shall consider the type of agricultural events organization that is applying for a relief payment, the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic on the agricultural events organization's agricultural events or business model, the size of the organization, and the availability of and the organization's access to other COVID-19 relief or grant funding. The commissioner or third-party contractor shall prioritize awarding grants to local county fairs before awarding grants to other agricultural events organizations.

Funding. For the 2020-21 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate two million dollars from the general fund to the department for allocation to the commissioner for the program. The commissioner may use the money, not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars, appropriated in accordance with this section for the costs of administering or contracting with a third party to administer the program.

Report.

The commissioner shall submit a report:

To the governor; and

At the hearing required by the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act", part 2 of article 7 of title 2.

The report required by this subsection (4) must detail how the money was allocated through the program, including:

The list of relief payment recipients with the amount allocated to each recipient;

The types of agricultural events organizations that received relief payments; and

Any other information deemed pertinent by the commissioner.

Repeal. This section is repealed, effective December 31, 2022.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1262), ch. 373, p. 2467, § 1, effective June 29.

35-1-107.7. Support for national western stock show - administration by commissioner - report - repeal.

For the 2020-21 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate three million five hundred thousand dollars from the general fund to the department for allocation to the commissioner for use in supporting or aiding the national western stock show event. At the end of the 2020-21 state fiscal year, any money not expended or encumbered from the appropriation remains available for expenditure in the 2021-22 fiscal year without further appropriation.

For the 2020-21 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate twenty-five million dollars from the general fund to the department for allocation to the commissioner for aiding the national western stock show event in constructing the national western stock show's campus. At the end of the 2020-21 state fiscal year, any money not expended or encumbered from the appropriation remains available for expenditure in the 2021-22 fiscal year without further appropriation.

The commissioner shall submit a report:

To the governor; and

At the hearing required by the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act", part 2 of article 7 of title 2.

The report required by this subsection (2) must detail how the money was allocated to provide support for and construction aid for the national western stock show.

This section is repealed, effective December 31, 2022.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1262), ch. 373, p. 2467, § 1, effective June 29.

35-1-108. Divisions created.

There is created in the department an administrative services division, a division of plant industry, a division of animal health, a division of markets, and a division of inspection and consumer services. These divisions are

type 2

entities, as defined in section 24-1-105.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 192, § 8.

CSA:

C. 5, § 13(10).

CRS 53:

§ 6-1-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-1-8.

L. 67:

p. 528, § 1.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3402, § 146, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

35-1-109. Employees interchangeable.

It is the duty of the commissioner of agriculture in the administration of his department to so organize the same that all employees of the department, so far as possible, shall be interchangeable in work assignment to the end that they may be shifted within the department so as to meet seasonal and emergency demands upon any division or section of the department and the number of such help kept to a minimum possible for efficient operation.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 196, § 12.

CSA:

C. 5, § 13(14).

CRS 53:

§ 6-1-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-1-9.

35-1-110. Legal adviser - legal actions.

The attorney general shall be the legal adviser for the department of agriculture and shall defend it in all actions and proceedings brought against it. The district attorney of the judicial district in which a cause of action may arise shall bring any action, civil or criminal, requested by the commissioner to abate a condition which exists in violation of, or to restrain or enjoin any action which is in violation of, or to prosecute for the violation of or for the enforcement of, the agricultural laws or the standards, orders, rules, and regulations of the department established by or issued under the provisions of this article. If the district attorney fails to act, the commissioner may bring any such action and shall be represented by the attorney general or, with the approval of the commission, by special counsel.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 196, § 14.

CSA:

C. 5, § 13(16).

CRS 53:

§ 6-1-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-1-11.

35-1-111. Records of receipts and expenditures - appropriations.

The department shall maintain records, in the manner prescribed by the controller, on all receipts and expenditures made with respect to each service for which moneys are credited to the general fund under the provisions of articles 1 to 13, 26, and 27 of this title and article 24 of title 30, C.R.S.

The general assembly shall appropriate moneys from the general fund for the administration of the services rendered by the department for which moneys are credited to the general fund under the provisions of articles 1 to 13, 26, and 27 of this title and article 24 of title 30, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 65:

pp. 196, 201, §§ 7, 18, 21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§§ 6-16-1, 7-17-1, 8-19-1.

35-1-112. Licensing functions subject to periodic review. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 79:

Entire section added, p. 1611, § 7, effective June 7.

L. 81:

(4) amended, p. 1704, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 85:

(4) amended, p. 1139, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 88:

(1), (2), and (4) amended, p. 932, § 22, effective April 28.

L. 90:

Entire section repealed, p. 1597, § 13, effective April 3.

35-1-113. Applications for licenses - authority to suspend licenses - rules.

Every application by an individual for a license issued by the department or any authorized agent of the department shall require the applicant's name, address, and social security number.

The department or any authorized agent of the department shall deny, suspend, or revoke any license pursuant to the provisions of section 26-13-126, C.R.S., and any rules promulgated in furtherance thereof, if the department or agent thereof receives a notice to deny, suspend, or revoke from the state child support enforcement agency because the licensee or applicant is out of compliance with a court or administrative order for current child support, child support debt, retroactive child support, child support arrearages, or child support when combined with maintenance or because the licensee or applicant has failed to comply with a properly issued subpoena or warrant relating to a paternity or child support proceeding. Any such denial, suspension, or revocation shall be in accordance with the procedures specified by rule of the department, rules promulgated by the state board of human services, and any memorandum of understanding entered into between the department or an authorized agent thereof and the state child support enforcement agency for the implementation of this section and section 26-13-126, C.R.S.

The department shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the state child support enforcement agency, which memorandum shall identify the relative responsibilities of the department and the state child support enforcement agency in the department of human services with respect to the implementation of this section and section 26-13-126, C.R.S.

The appropriate rule-making body of the department is authorized to promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section.

For purposes of this section, "license" means any recognition, authority, or permission that the department or any authorized agent of the department is authorized by law to issue for an individual to practice a profession or occupation or for an individual to participate in any recreational activity. "License" may include, but is not necessarily limited to, any license, certificate, certification, letter of authorization, or registration issued for an individual to practice a profession or occupation or for an individual to participate in any recreational activity.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1309, § 45, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1997 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 236, Session Laws of Colorado 1997.

35-1-114. Agricultural drought and climate resilience office - creation - rules - definition.

Legislative declaration. The general assembly hereby:

Finds that:

Severe droughts, as well as unaddressed water demands associated with urban growth, will add pressure to Colorado's already strained water supply in all of Colorado's watersheds;

More frequent and severe droughts will add pressure to Colorado's already strained water supply; and

A strong, prosperous, diverse, and resilient agricultural sector is fundamental to the fabric of Colorado;

Determines that:

Colorado's agricultural producers are stewards of our lands, waters, and ecosystems, but they cannot shoulder the burden of water scarcity without addressing water-saving measures being implemented and sustained in urban areas; and

Colorado's agricultural sector is a leader in implementing practices that build resiliency, conserve our water supplies, provide an economic base for rural communities, and enhance our environment; and

Declares that:

Creating the agricultural drought and climate resilience office will support and elevate producers in their resiliency efforts through nonregulatory, voluntary, and incentive-based programs without negatively impacting the overall rural economic viability of agricultural operations and rural communities; and

The agricultural drought and climate resilience office can best address and mitigate agricultural climate-related issues on a wide scale by providing support to and assisting bona fide agricultural producers in implementing practices that minimize the impacts of climate change.

Office created. There is hereby created in the department the agricultural drought and climate resilience office, referred to in this section as the "office". The office may provide voluntary technical assistance, nonregulatory programs, and incentives that increase the ability to anticipate, prepare for, mitigate, adapt to, and respond to hazardous events, trends, or disturbances related to drought or the climate. The office shall advise the commissioner, the Colorado agricultural value-added development board created in section 35-75-203, other state agencies, and the governor on the impact to agriculture of drought and climate policies and programs. The commissioner shall appoint the head of the office.

Rules. The commissioner may promulgate rules necessary for the administration of the office's assistance, programs, and incentives, including grants. Before promulgating the rules, the commissioner shall convene a stakeholder group, including representatives of organizations whose membership consists of agricultural producers engaged in the production of the top ten agricultural commodities produced in Colorado and members of the state conservation board created in section 35-70-103 (1)(a). The stakeholder group shall advise the commissioner as to the needs of the agriculture industry to respond to and mitigate the impacts of climate change on agricultural production. For the purpose of this section, "bona fide agricultural producer" means an agricultural producer that receives a majority of the producer's annual income from agriculture, an agricultural producer that spends more than one thousand forty hours per year engaged in agricultural production, or a Colorado business that processes agricultural products. Except for a program or support administered by the office to address immediate needs as a result of disaster, including wildfire and drought, or a program that was in existence on January 1, 2021:

A program administered by the office must be designed to benefit bona fide agricultural producers actively engaged in agriculture. Grants awarded by the office must pay for implementation of practices to address and mitigate the impacts of climate change or drought or to provide direct adaptation support for impacted agricultural communities, including mental health resources, conflict resolution assistance, and risk-management guidance. A grant award may pay no more than five percent of administrative expenses incurred by a bona fide agricultural producer to implement the practices.

The department shall, at least thirty days before opening the grant application process, make available on its website information related to the grant program available to bone fide agricultural producers;

A grant authorized pursuant to this section must receive final approval by the commission before a final award can be issued; and

The department shall post on its website all applications for grant awards. Within fifteen days after awarding a grant, the department shall post on its website the name of the individual or entity receiving a grant, the amount of the grant awarded, the project or projects to be funded by the grant, and the duration of the grant award.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1242), ch. 332, p. 2143, § 1, effective June 24.

35-1-115. Agriculture and drought resilience - cash fund - legislative declaration - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-234), ch. 235, p. 1236, § 1, effective June 15.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective September 1, 2022. (See L. 2021, p. 1236.)

35-1-116. Blockchain educational program - repeal.

On or before January 1, 2024, the commissioner shall create and deploy an online program that teaches:

The benefits of implementing blockchain technology in agricultural production, distribution, and sales;

The different blockchain programs that exist for agricultural producers; and

The requirements to begin using a blockchain program in accordance with best practices for agricultural producers.

The commissioner shall consult and cooperate with stakeholders to develop the online program using best practices. To implement this section, the commissioner may consult or contract with the Colorado state university system.

The commissioner shall publicize the educational program and encourage agricultural producers to participate in the program.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2030.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1053), ch. 385, p. 2748, § 1, effective August 10.

35-1-117. Community food access program - creation - purpose - duties and responsibilities - grant program - funding - reporting - rules - definitions - repeal.

There is created in the department a community food access program. The purpose of the program is to improve access to and lower prices for healthy foods in low-income and underserved areas of the state by supporting small food retailers.

As part of the program, the department shall create a community food consortium for small food retailers and Colorado-owned and Colorado-operated farms that has the following duties and responsibilities:

Providing technical assistance in purchasing and negotiations;

Providing subsidies for pallet, pallet break, distribution, and delivery fees;

Assisting with connecting small food producers to small food retailers, which ultimately supports the farm, retailer, and consumer;

Operating as a food value chain coordinator to connect small food retailers to Colorado-owned and Colorado-operated farms and small- and large-scale distributors; and

Providing technical support to small food retailers who choose to participate in the consortium with negotiating pallet, pallet break, pricing, distribution, and delivery fees for better prices on wholesale products.

For the 2022-23 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate one million dollars from the economic recovery and relief cash fund created in section 24-75-228 to the department for the purposes of implementing this section.

The department is authorized to use up to seven percent of the total money appropriated to the program for the direct and indirect costs of administering the program.

Money spent pursuant to this subsection (2) must conform with the allowable purposes set forth in the federal "American Rescue Plan Act of 2021", Pub.L. 117-2, as amended. The department shall either spend or obligate such appropriation prior to December 30, 2024, and expend the appropriation on or before December 31, 2026.

The state department shall comply with the compliance, reporting, record-keeping, and program evaluation requirements established by the office of state planning and budgeting and the state controller in accordance with section 24-75-226 (5).

This subsection (2) is repealed, effective September 1, 2027.

As part of the program, the department shall create and manage the small food business recovery and resilience grant program. The department shall award one-time grants, not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars, out of the grant program, to participating small food retailers and small family farms for:

(I) Assisting with the necessary costs of operating;

(II) Purchasing costly equipment, including but not limited to cold storage, display shelving, and calibrated and certified produce scales;

(III) Providing accounting and book management support; and

(IV) Purchasing or updating point of sales systems or equipment to allow participating small food retailers to accept payment from any food incentive program.

The department shall create an advisory committee consisting of no more than seven members to assist with the grant program. The advisory committee may include but need not be limited to members that reflect community and nonprofit organizations that have experience relevant to subsection (4)(a) of this section, small food retailers, and small family farms that are not applying for grant funding, an individual who has participated in a supplemental food assistance benefit program, and department staff with experience in grant-making. The commissioner shall select the members of the advisory committee.

The advisory committee's role is to make recommendations on and assist with:

The development of the grant application;

A disbursement timeline for the grants;

A rubric to evaluate grant applications;

The evaluation of grant applications; and

Awarding grant money to eligible recipients.

The department and advisory committee shall award at least thirty percent of the grants to applicants located in rural areas.

For the 2022-23 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate seven million dollars from the economic recovery and relief cash fund created in section 24-75-228 to the department for the purposes of implementing this subsection (3) and subsection (4) of this section.

The department is authorized to use up to ten percent of the total money appropriated to the program for the direct and indirect costs of administering the program.

Money spent pursuant to this subsection (3) must conform with the allowable purposes set forth in the federal "American Rescue Plan Act of 2021", Pub.L. 117-2, as amended. The department shall either spend or obligate such appropriation prior to December 30, 2024, and expend the appropriation on or before December 31, 2026.

The state department shall comply with the compliance, reporting, record-keeping, and program evaluation requirements established by the office of state planning and budgeting and the state controller in accordance with section 24-75-226 (5).

This subsection (3) is repealed, effective September 1, 2027.

The department shall develop a strategy for outreach to Colorado-owned and Colorado-operated farms and food retailers and small farms that are interested in participating in the consortium or applying for a grant through the grant program. The outreach strategy must include:

Funding for partnerships with nonprofit organizations to ensure applicants for the consortium and grant program reflect the identity and needs of their individual communities. The outreach strategy must include funding for partnerships with nonprofit organizations that have:

Experience working with small food retailers and small family farms that currently accept payment from any incentive program;

Experience running and supporting small food retailers and small family farms or any other food incentive program;

Experience with grant-making;

Community relationships that will ensure that outreach to small food retailers and small farms reflects the identity and needs of individual communities; or

A demonstrated track record of working in food access and food justice; and

Working with local governments, counties, towns, and other municipalities.

On or before January 30, 2027, the department shall submit a report to the agriculture, livestock, and water committee of the house of representatives and the agriculture and natural resources committee of the senate, or any successor committees, on the grant program and consortium, including information on grantees, use of grant funds, SNAP sales, and produce and stocking data.

For the 2022-23 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate one million dollars from the economic recovery and relief cash fund created in section 24-75-228 to the department of human services. The department of human services shall use the appropriation for electronic benefits transfer back-end programmatic updates. The appropriation must also be used for new functionality with the contracted financial technology vendor and eligibility system that makes it possible to deposit time-limited incentive funds based on qualifying purchases back into an account by an authorized electronic benefits transfer retailer with the appropriate middleware.

The department of human services is authorized to use up to ten percent of the total money appropriated to the program for the direct and indirect costs of administering the program.

Money spent pursuant to this subsection (6) must conform with the allowable purposes set forth in the federal "American Rescue Plan Act of 2021", Pub.L. 117-2, as amended. The department of human services shall either spend or obligate such appropriation prior to December 30, 2024, and expend the appropriation on or before December 31, 2026.

The department of human services shall comply with the compliance, reporting, record-keeping, and program evaluation requirements established by the office of state planning and budgeting and the state controller in accordance with section 24-75-226 (5).

This subsection (6) is repealed, effective September 1, 2027.

The department shall promulgate rules as necessary for the implementation of this section.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Consortium" means the community food consortium created in subsection (2) of this section.

"Grant program" means the small food business recovery and resilience grant program created in subsection (3) of this section.

"Program" means the community food access program created in subsection (1) of this section.

"Small family farm" means a farm that is Colorado-owned and Colorado-operated and has an annual gross revenue below three hundred fifty thousand dollars.

"Small food retailer" means:

An independent or nonprofit-managed, Colorado-owned, and Colorado-operated small food retail business, defined as a food retailer with less than five thousand square feet of retail space that carries at least three categories of federally defined staple foods, as described in the federal "Food and Nutrition Act of 2008", secs. 3 and 9, the "Consolidated Appropriations Act of 2017", sec. 76, and the federal "Enhancing Retailer Standards in the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program", 81 Fed. Reg. 90675, and be located in or provide food to local, state, or federally defined low-income, low-access neighborhoods; or

A farmer's market or farm-direct operation that is already or demonstrates an intent to become SNAP and WIC-authorized where allowed.

"SNAP" means the supplemental nutrition assistance program established in part 3 of article 2 of title 26.

"WIC" means the special supplemental nutrition program for women, infants, and children, created pursuant to 42 U.S.C. sec. 1786.

This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2027.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1380), ch. 375, p. 2664, § 5, effective June 3.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1380, see section 1 of chapter 375, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.